Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
JOINT UNDERWRITING PLAN

Subpart A.
Participation and Administration

§431:10C-401 Participation. (a) A
joint underwriting plan is established consisting of all insurers authorized to
write and engage in writing motor vehicle insurance in this State, except those
insurers writing motor vehicle insurance exclusively under section 431:10C-106.

(b) Each insurer shall be a member of the plan
and shall maintain membership as a condition of its licensure to transact such
insurance in this State. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 195, §36]

Case Notes

Petitioner, who was assigned by the state insurance joint
underwriting program bureau to respondent under the assigned claim procedure,
was owed a duty of good faith by respondent given that: (1) under the assigned
claims procedure, respondent owed the same rights and obligations to petitioner
as respondent would owe to an insured to whom respondent had issued a motor
vehicle mandatory public liability and property insurance policy; and (2) respondent's
good faith covenant implied in motor vehicle policies applied to claimants
under the assigned claim procedure irrespective of the absence of a written
insurance policy. 129 H. 478, 304 P.3d 619 (2013).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next